Colorado, session 2026A, SB143.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-1305.5, amend (1)
as follows:
2-2-1305.5. Representative Hugh McKean and Senator Faith
Winter Colorado youth advisory council review committee - created.
(1) There is created in the legislative branch the Representative
Hugh McKean AND SENATOR FAITH WINTER Colorado youth advisory
council review committee to review the council's work. The committee is
comprised of ten members, as described in subsection (2) of this section.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-1301.5, amend (4)
as follows:
2-2-1301.5. Definitions.
As used in this part 13, unless the context otherwise requires:
(4) "Review committee" means the Representative Hugh McKean
AND SENATOR FAITH WINTER Colorado youth advisory council review
committee created in section 2-2-1305.5.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-143

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-143